apertium-mar.mar.dix
		<pardef n="क/सा__adj">
 			<e> 		<p><l>सा</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>शी</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>शे</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>से</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>शे</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>से</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>श्या</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>शा</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>शी</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>श्या</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>शा</l><r>सा<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="ख/रा__adj">
 			<e> 		<p><l>रा</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>री</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>रे</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e र="LR"> 	<p><l>रं</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>रे</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ऱ्या</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>री</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ऱ्या</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="दुस/रा__adj">
 			<e> 		<p><l>रा</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>री</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>रे</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>रं</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR"> 	<p><l>र्</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>रे</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ऱ्या</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>री</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ऱ्या</l><r>रा<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="थोड/ासा__adj">
 			<e><p><l>ासा</l><r>ासा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e><p><l>ीशी</l><r>ासा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e><p><l>ेसे</l><r>ासा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e><p><l>ेसे</l><r>ासा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e><p><l>्याशा</l><r>ासा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e><p><l>ीशी</l><r>ासा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e><p><l>्याशा</l><r>ासा<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>
	
		<!-- proper nouns (do cases) -->

	    <pardef n="जेम्स__np">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>  
	            
	    <pardef n="मैरी__np">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>    
	    
	    <pardef n="मोटलानी__np">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>

	    <pardef n="भारत__np">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>

	    </pardef>

	    <pardef n="टाटा__np">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>

	    <pardef n="उत्तर__np">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>

		<!-- nouns -->

		<pardef n="मुल/गा__n_m">
			<e> 		<p><l>गा</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ा</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ा</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ं</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ां</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ां</l><r>गा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="मुल/गी__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l>गी</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ीं</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ीं</l><r>गी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="चो/री__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l>री</l><r>री<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>री</l><r>री<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>री</l><r>री<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>र्या</l><r>री<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>र्यां</l><r>री<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>र्यां</l><r>री<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="कवी__n_m">
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="कवी__n_f">
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<e lm="मुलगा"> 						<i>मुल</i><par n="मुल/गा__n_m"/></e>
		<e lm="मुलगी"> 						<i>मुल</i><par n="मुल/गी__n_f"/></e>
		<e lm="भिरभिरी">                      	<i>भिरभि</i><par n="चो/री__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="शेरी">                         	<i>शे</i><par n="चो/री__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="हांगदारी">                     	<i>हांगदा</i><par n="चो/री__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="नातरी">                        	<i>नात</i><par n="चो/री__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="सोदेगिरी">                     	<i>सोदेगि</i><par n="चो/री__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="संस्कृती">                  	<i>संस्कृती</i><par n="कवी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="चिनी">                  	<i>चिनी</i><par n="कवी__n_f" /></e>
		<e lm="शब्दवेधी">                     	<i>शब्दवेधी</i><par n="कवी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="बहकावणी">                      	<i>बहकावणी</i><par n="कवी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="ज्यू">                         	<i>ज्यू</i><par n="कवी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="ओंगळपणा">                      	<i>ओंगळपणा</i><par n="कवी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="तेलकटपणा">                     	<i>तेलकटपणा</i><par n="कवी__n_m" /></e>
		<e lm="आपलासा">                       	<i>आपला</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="छोटासा">                       	<i>छोटा</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="असा">                          	<i>अ</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="जसजसा">                        	<i>जसज</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="लहानसा">                       	<i>लहान</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="तसतसा">                        	<i>तसत</i><par n="क/सा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="खुपरा">                        	<i>खुप</i><par n="ख/रा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="अपुरा">                        	<i>अपु</i><par n="ख/रा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="बिचारा">                       	<i>बिचा</i><par n="ख/रा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="म्हातारा">                     	<i>म्हाता</i><par n="ख/रा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="सामोरा">                       	<i>सामो</i><par n="ख/रा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="दुखरा">                        	<i>दुख</i><par n="ख/रा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="दुसरा">                        	<i>दुस</i><par n="दुस/रा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="थोडासा">                        <i>थोड</i><par n="थोड/ासा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="छोटासा">                        <i>छोट</i><par n="थोड/ासा__adj" /></e>
		<e lm="दामोदर"> 	<i>दामोदर</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
		<e lm="मोदी"> 	<i>मोदी</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
		<e lm="अर्बाब"> 	<i>अर्बाब</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
		<e lm="नज़ीर"> 	<i>नज़ीर</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
		<e lm="आलिया"> 	<i>आलिया</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="ऑलिंपिक">	<i>ऑलिंपिक</i><par n="टाटा__np" /></e>
		<e lm="नोकिया">	<i>नोकिया</i><par n="टाटा__np" /></e>
		<e lm="मोजिल्ला"> 	<i>मोजिल्ला</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
		<e lm="गोखले">	<i>गोखले</i><par n="मोटलानी__np" /></e>
		<e lm="भावे">	<i>भावे</i><par n="मोटलानी__np" /></e>
		<e lm="जोधा"> 	<i>जोधा</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="बिरला"> 	<i>बिरला</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="हिलेरी"> 	<i>हिलेरी</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="संस्कृत">	<i>संस्कृत</i><par n="उत्तर__np" /></e>
		<e lm="पोप">	<i>पोप</i><par n="उत्तर__np" /></e>
		<e lm="तेलुगू">	<i>तेलुगू</i><par n="उत्तर__np" /></e>
		<e lm="मल्याळम">	<i>मल्याळम</i><par n="उत्तर__np" /></e>
		<e lm="ईस्ट"> 	<i>ईस्ट</i><par n="उत्तर__np"/></e>
		<e lm="मुख़तार"> 	<i>मुख़तार</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
		<e lm="औरंगजेब"> 	<i>औरंगजेब</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
		<e lm="वैशाली"> 	<i>वैशाली</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="शुक्ल"> 	<i>शुक्ल</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="महादेवी"> 	<i>महादेवी</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="हिटलर"> 	<i>हिटलर</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="अंबानी"> 	<i>अंबानी</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="भारती"> 	<i>भारती</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
		<e lm="पवार"> 	<i>पवार</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
		<e lm="विकिपीडिया"> 	<i>विकिपीडिया</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
		<e lm="मैसूर"> 	<i>मैसूर</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
		<e lm="उम्मा"> 	<i>उम्मा</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
		<e lm="डेन‌मार्क‌"> 	<i>डेन‌मार्क‌</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
		<e lm="मॉल्डोवा"> 	<i>मॉल्डोवा</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
		<e lm="डिसेंबर"> 	<i>डिसेंबर</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
		<e lm="लुब्लिन"> 	<i>लुब्लिन</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
